Idaho, session 2025, S1039.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby amended
by the addition thereto of a NEW CHAPTER, to be known and designated as Chap-
ter 90, Title 18, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
CHAPTER 90
IMMIGRATION COOPERATION AND ENFORCEMENT ACT
18-9001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as
the "Immigration Cooperation and Enforcement Act."
18-9002. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Custodial authority" means the director of the department of cor-
rection, county sheriffs, city chiefs of police, and any of their subordi-
nates with the power to confine or detain a person under color of law.
(2) "Dangerous crime" means:
(a) A violation of section 18-905 (aggravated assault defined), 18-907
(aggravated battery defined), 18-909 (assault with intent to commit
a serious felony defined), 18-911 (battery with intent to commit a
serious felony defined), 18-1401 (burglary defined), 18-1508 (lewd
and lascivious conduct), 18-2403(2)(e) (extortion), 18-2501 (rescu-
ing prisoners), 18-2505 (escape by one charged with or convicted of a
felony), 18-2506 (escape by one charged with or convicted of a misde-
meanor), 18-4003 (degrees of murder), 18-4006 (manslaughter), 18-4015
(assault with intent to murder), 18-4501 (kidnapping defined), 18-5001
(mayhem defined), 18-6101 (rape defined), 18-6501 (robbery defined),
37-2732(a) (delivery, manufacture or possession of a controlled sub-
stance with intent to deliver), or 37-2732B (trafficking), Idaho Code;
(b) Any offense for which an extended term of imprisonment can be im-
posed under section 19-2520B, Idaho Code;


(c) Any offense requiring sex offender registration as set forth in
section 18-8304, Idaho Code;
(d) The commission of a felony on the grounds of a correctional facility
located in this state; or
(e) Any attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the crimes listed in this
subsection.
(3) "Dangerous illegal alien" means an illegal alien who has previously
been convicted or found guilty, by judgment or withheld judgment, of a dan-
gerous crime in this state, or of a crime that would constitute a dangerous
crime if the offense had been committed in this state and the person could
have been punished under the laws of this state for commission of a dangerous
crime.
(4) "DHS" means the United States department of homeland security and
its subordinate agencies and divisions.
(5) "Illegal alien" means a person eighteen (18) years of age or older
who is verified by the federal government to be present in the United States
in violation of the federal immigration and nationality act, 8 U.S.C., and
federal rules promulgated in accordance therewith.
(6) "Immigration detainer" means a notice or other documentation is-
sued by United States immigration and customs enforcement requesting that a
custodial authority or law enforcement official maintain temporary custody
of an illegal alien, including a DHS form I-247 document or a similar succes-
sor form.
(7) "Law enforcement official" means all state, county, and local law
enforcement officers, prosecuting attorneys, and city attorneys.
18-9003. COOPERATION WITH FEDERAL AUTHORITIES. (1) To the extent au-
thorized by federal law, law enforcement officials shall be authorized to
send, receive, and maintain information relating to the immigration status
of dangerous illegal aliens for public safety purposes. Except as provided
by federal law, law enforcement officials shall not be prohibited from re-
ceiving or maintaining information relating to the immigration status of any
dangerous illegal alien or sending or exchanging such information with other
federal, state, or local law enforcement agencies for official public safety
purposes.
(2) Law enforcement officials shall not be prohibited from entering
into memorandums of understanding, agreements, and memorandums of agreement
with the United States department of justice, DHS, or any other federal law
enforcement agency for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration laws as
against dangerous illegal aliens, including section 287(g) of the federal
illegal immigration reform and immigrant responsibility act of 1996, P.L.
104-208, or a similar federal program.
(3) Except as provided by federal law, no law enforcement official
shall be prohibited from utilizing available federal resources, including
databases, equipment, grant funds, training, or participation in incentive
programs for any public safety purpose related to the enforcement of federal
immigration laws as against dangerous illegal aliens.
18-9004. COOPERATION WITH IMMIGRATION DETAINERS. Where a custodial
authority has custody of a person in a correctional facility, state reha-


bilitation center, penitentiary, prison, county jail, or city jail, and
the person is subject to an immigration detainer, the custodial authority
shall comply with, honor, and fulfill any reasonable request made in the
immigration detainer as long as it does not impose undue burden or expense
on the custodial authority or law enforcement officials and shall inform the
person identified in the immigration detainer that the person is being held
pursuant to such immigration detainer.
18-9005. UNLAWFUL PRESENCE OF A DANGEROUS ILLEGAL ALIEN. (1) The crime
of unlawful presence of a dangerous illegal alien is committed when a danger-
ous illegal alien enters, remains in, or is found in the state of Idaho.
(2) A law enforcement official shall not be prohibited from making an
arrest of any dangerous illegal alien found in Idaho.
(3) Whoever commits the crime of unlawful presence of a dangerous ille-
gal alien upon a first offense shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and impris-
oned for not more than six (6) months, fined not more than one thousand dol-
lars ($1,000), or both.
(4) Whoever commits the crime of unlawful presence of a dangerous il-
legal alien upon a second or subsequent offense shall be guilty of a felony
and imprisoned for not less than one (1) year and not more than two (2) years,
fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.
(5) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a dangerous ille-
gal alien as long as the person is a necessary witness, as a victim or oth-
erwise, to a crime of domestic violence, rape, sexual exploitation, sexual
assault, murder, manslaughter, assault, battery, human trafficking, kid-
napping, false imprisonment, involuntary servitude, fraud in foreign labor
contracting, blackmail, extortion, or witness tampering.
18-9006. SMUGGLING A DANGEROUS ILLEGAL ALIEN. (1) The crime of smug-
gling a dangerous illegal alien is committed when a person knowingly and
willfully transports into this state, for the first time, a dangerous ille-
gal alien that the person knows, or reasonably should know, is a dangerous
illegal alien.
(2) A person commits a separate offense for each individual transported
into this state in violation of the provisions of this section.
(3) Whoever commits the crime of smuggling a dangerous illegal alien
shall be guilty of a felony and imprisoned for not less than one (1) year
and not more than two (2) years, fined not more than ten thousand dollars
($10,000), or both.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not apply if the defendant is
a necessary witness to or victim of a crime of domestic violence, rape, sex-
ual exploitation, sexual assault, murder, manslaughter, assault, battery,
human trafficking, kidnapping, false imprisonment, involuntary servitude,
fraud in foreign labor contracting, blackmail, extortion, or witness tam-
pering where the referenced crime occurred during the defendant's act of
transporting the dangerous illegal alien.
18-9007. SENTENCING ENHANCEMENT. Any person eighteen (18) years of
age or older that is convicted of a violation of a dangerous crime, committed
while the person is an illegal alien, shall be sentenced to an extended term


of imprisonment. The extended term of imprisonment required in this section
shall be computed by adding five (5) years of imprisonment to the term of
sentence otherwise imposed, and the first five (5) years of imprisonment
shall be fixed and determinate. The extended term provided in this section
shall not be imposed unless the fact of the person's status as an illegal
alien while committing the crime is separately charged in the information
or indictment and admitted by the accused or found to be true by the trier of
fact at the trial of the substantive crime. The provisions of this section
shall apply even in those cases where the person's status as an illegal alien
is an element of the offense. The limitations set forth in section 19-2520E,
Idaho Code, shall not apply to the extended term required by this section.
18-9008. DETERMINATION OF ALIENAGE UPON CONFINEMENT. (1) Following
entry of a judgment of conviction for a criminal offense, the immigration
status of any person eighteen (18) years of age or older shall be determined
by the custodial authority whenever any person is processed for confinement
in any correctional facility, state rehabilitation center, penitentiary,
prison, county jail, or city jail. If it is determined that the person is an
illegal alien, then the custodial authority shall notify DHS of the identity
of the person so confined and the place of confinement. Such notification
shall be provided within forty-eight (48) hours of the person being placed
in confinement.
(2) A person's immigration status shall be considered confirmed as not
an illegal alien if the person provides:
(a) A valid Idaho driver's license;
(b) A valid Idaho identification card;
(c) A valid United States passport;
(d) Any valid driver's license or identification card issued by a state
or district or territory of the United States, provided the issuing
authority limits issuance of the foregoing to persons who demonstrate
lawful presence in the United States;
(e) Any valid identification card issued by the United States, includ-
ing those issued by the department of defense, provided the issuing
authority limits issuance of the foregoing to persons who demonstrate
lawful presence in the United States; or
(f) Any other information sufficiently reliable to demonstrate the
identity of the confined person and the person's lawful presence in the
United States.
18-9009. CONDITIONS OF RELEASE OF ILLEGAL ALIEN FROM CONFINE-
MENT. Following entry of a judgment of conviction for a criminal offense,
no person eighteen (18) years of age or older that is known to be an ille-
gal alien shall be released from confinement in any correctional facility,
state rehabilitation center, penitentiary, prison, county jail, or city
jail prior to the person's completion of his sentence unless the custodial
authority first obtains written confirmation from DHS that DHS will take
custody of the person upon release and deport the person from the United
States. The provisions of this section shall apply to any fixed or inde-
terminate confinement but shall not apply to temporary confinement under
alternate sentencing programs such as work release, inmate labor detail,


a scheduled sentence program, or similar programs. The provisions of this
section shall apply to any release from confinement as part of probation,
parole, or supervised release after a judgment of conviction is entered.
18-9010. AUTHORITY TO TRANSPORT ILLEGAL ALIENS. Following entry of a
judgment of conviction for a criminal offense, if a custodial authority has
verification that a person is an illegal alien, then the custodial authority
shall be authorized to securely transport such illegal alien to a federal fa-
cility in this state or to any other temporary point of detention and to rea-
sonably detain such illegal alien when authorized by a federal law immigra-
tion detainer or federal arrest warrant.
18-9011. IMMUNITY. A law enforcement official or custodial authority
acting in good faith to carry out duties or activities allowed by this chap-
ter shall have immunity from damages or liability from such actions.
18-9012. INTERPRETATION. (1) The provisions of this chapter relating
to immigration terminology and definitions shall be construed to have the
same meanings as provided under federal immigration law, unless otherwise
defined in this chapter.
(2) The provisions of this chapter shall be construed and implemented
in a manner consistent with federal laws and regulations, and interpretive
case law, governing immigration and civil rights.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval.